North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131D. Inspection and Licensing of Facilities.
Article 1. Adult Care Homes.

Part 1. Licensing.

§ 131D-1.

Recodified as G. S. 131D-10.10 by Session Laws 2009-462, s. 1(b), effective October 1, 2009.

§ 131D-2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-462, s. 1, effective October 1, 2009.

§ 131D-2.1.
Definitions.

As used in this Article:

Abuse. — The willful or grossly negligent infliction of physical pain, injury, or mental anguish, unreasonable confinement, or the willful or grossly negligent deprivation by the administrator or staff of an adult care home of services which are necessary to maintain mental and physical health.

Administrator. — A person approved by the Department of Health and Human Services as an assisted living administrator under G.S. 90-288.14 or as an adult care home administrator under G.S. 90-288.14A, who has the responsibility for the total operation of a licensed adult care home.

Adult care home. — An assisted living residence in which the housing management provides 24-hour scheduled and unscheduled personal care services to two or more residents, either directly or for scheduled needs, through formal written agreement with licensed home care or hospice agencies. Some licensed adult care homes provide supervision to persons with cognitive impairments whose decisions, if made independently, may jeopardize the safety or well-being of themselves or others and therefore require supervision. Medication in an adult care home may be administered by designated trained staff. Adult care homes that provide care to two to six unrelated residents are commonly called family care homes.

(3a)

Adult care home resident discharge team. — A team consisting of one member from the department of social services and one member from the local management entity responsible for assisting in finding an appropriate placement for discharged residents, as established by the county department of social services in every county which contains an adult care home licensed under this Chapter.

Amenities. — Services such as meals, housekeeping, transportation, and grocery shopping that do not involve hands-on personal care.

Assisted living residence. — Any group housing and services program for two or more unrelated adults, by whatever name it is called, that makes available, at a minimum, one meal a day and housekeeping services and provides personal care services directly or through a formal written agreement with one or more licensed home care or hospice agencies. The Department may allow nursing service exceptions on a case-by-case basis. Settings in which services are delivered may include self-contained apartment units or single or shared room units with private or area baths. Assisted living residences are to be distinguished from nursing homes subject to provisions of G.S. 131E-102. There are three types of assisted living residences: adult care homes, adult care homes that serve only elderly persons, and multiunit assisted housing with services. As used in this section, “elderly person” means:

Any person who has attained the age of 55 years or older and requires assistance with activities of daily living, housing, and services, or

Any adult who has a primary diagnosis of Alzheimer’s disease or other form of dementia who requires assistance with activities of daily living, housing, and services provided by a licensed Alzheimer’s and dementia care unit.

Compensatory agent. — A spouse, relative, or other caretaker who lives with a resident and provides care to a resident.

Department. — The Department of Health and Human Services unless some other meaning is clearly indicated from the context.

Exploitation. — The illegal or improper use of an aged or disabled resident or the aged or disabled resident’s resources for another’s profit or advantage.

Family care home. — An adult care home having two to six residents. The structure of a family care home may be no more than two stories high, and none of the aged or physically disabled persons being served there may be housed in the upper story without provision for two direct exterior ground-level accesses to the upper story.

(9a)

Hearing Unit. — The chief hearing officer within the Division of Health Benefits designated to preside over hearings regarding the transfer and discharge of adult care home residents, and the chief hearing officer’s staff.

Multiunit assisted housing with services. — An assisted living residence in which hands-on personal care services and nursing services which are arranged by housing management are provided by a licensed home care or hospice agency through an individualized written care plan. The housing management has a financial interest or financial affiliation or formal written agreement which makes personal care services accessible and available through at least one licensed home care or hospice agency. The resident has a choice of any provider, and the housing management may not combine charges for housing and personal care services. All residents, or their compensatory agents, must be capable, through informed consent, of entering into a contract and must not be in need of 24-hour supervision. Assistance with self-administration of medications may be provided by appropriately trained staff when delegated by a licensed nurse according to the home care agency’s established plan of care. Multiunit assisted housing with services programs are required to register annually with the Division of Health Service Regulation. Multiunit assisted housing with services programs are required to provide a disclosure statement to the Division of Health Service Regulation. The disclosure statement is required to be a part of the annual rental contract that includes a description of the following requirements:

Emergency response system;

Charges for services offered;

Limitations of tenancy;

Limitations of services;

Resident responsibilities;

Financial/legal relationship between housing management and home care or hospice agencies;

A listing of all home care or hospice agencies and other community services in the area;

An appeals process; and

Procedures for required initial and annual resident screening and referrals for services.

Continuing care retirement communities, subject to regulation by the Department of Insurance under Chapter 58 of the General Statutes, and temporary family health care structures, as defined in G.S. 160A-383.5, are exempt from the regulatory requirements for multiunit assisted housing with services programs.

Neglect. — The failure to provide the services necessary to maintain a resident’s physical or mental health.

Personal care services. — Any hands-on services allowed to be performed by In-Home Aides II or III as outlined in Department rules.

Registration. — The submission by a multiunit assisted housing with services provider of a disclosure statement containing all the information as outlined in subdivision (10) of this section.

Resident. — A person living in an assisted living residence for the purpose of obtaining access to housing and services provided or made available by housing management.

Secretary. — The Secretary of Health and Human Services unless some other meaning is clearly indicated from the context.

History.

2009-462, ss. 1(e), 3(a); 2011-272, s. 1; 2014-94, s. 4; 2018-5, s. 11G.1(a); 2019-81, s. 15(a).

Adult Care Home Accreditation Pilot Program.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9E.6, as amended by Session Laws 2021-189, s. 3.1, provides: “(a) Definitions. — As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

“(1) Control group member. — A pilot ACH that (i) is selected to participate in the pilot program and (ii) has agreed to provide data to evaluate the effectiveness of the pilot program without participating in the accreditation process.

“(2) Department. — The North Carolina Department of Health and Human Services.

“(3) NCALA. — The North Carolina Assisted Living Association, a nonprofit corporation.

“(4) NCSLA. — The North Carolina Senior Living Association, a nonprofit corporation.

“(5) Pilot ACH. — A licensed adult care home selected to participate in the pilot program.

“(6) Pilot program. — The two year pilot program authorized by subsection (b) of this section for the purpose of comparing the impact of accreditation and licensure approaches on care and resident health and other outcomes.

“(7) Pilot Program Accrediting Body. — The Accreditation Commission for Health Care, a nonprofit accreditation organization.

“(8) Program participant. — A pilot ACH that (i) is selected to participate in the pilot program and (ii) has agreed to provide data to evaluate the effectiveness of the pilot program and to participate in the accreditation process.

“(9) Sheps Center. — The Program on Aging, Disability, and Long Term Care within the Cecil G. Sheps Center for Health Services Research located at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill.

“(10) Stakeholder Advisory Group. — The advisory group appointed under subsection (c) of this section.

“(b) Pilot Program. — The Sheps Center shall oversee the administration of a two year pilot program to be conducted by the Pilot Program Accrediting Body and the Sheps Center to evaluate the effectiveness of an accreditation process for adult care homes that would deem adult care homes eligible for ongoing licensure and exempt accredited adult care homes from routine inspections if they meet required standards and requirements. The goal of the pilot program is to study the effectiveness of accreditation through an evaluation of quality outcome measures to be developed by the Sheps Center for the purpose of determining whether accreditation achieves compliance with licensure requirements and improves or maintains quality of care compared with a control group. In conducting the pilot program, the Sheps Center shall collaborate with the Pilot Program Accrediting Body, the Department, the NCSLA, the NCALA, the Stakeholder Advisory Group appointed under subsection (c) of this section, and any other qualified entity or State agency that may be of assistance in accomplishing the objectives of the pilot program. The Department shall have access to all of the following upon request:

“(1) Unredacted records maintained by the Pilot Program Accrediting Body related to surveys conducted by the Pilot Program Accrediting Body.

“(2) Deidentified data related to quality outcome measures collected or generated by the Sheps Center.

“(c) Stakeholder Advisory Group. — The Department shall appoint a Stakeholder Advisory Group representing other interested parties not already involved in the pilot program authorized by subsection (b) of this section, which shall be composed of, at minimum, at least one member representing Friends of Residents in Long Term Care, the North Carolina Ombudsman Association, AARP North Carolina, Disability Rights North Carolina, directors of county departments of social services, and the Department. The Sheps Center shall keep the Stakeholder Advisory Group informed of the progress of study design and operation of the pilot program and shall offer the Stakeholder Advisory Group an opportunity to periodically offer recommendations on study design, pilot program operation, and ultimate implementation of the accreditation process for program participants.

“(d) Pilot Accrediting Body Reporting. — As a condition of participating in the pilot program authorized by this section, the Pilot Program Accrediting Body must agree to submit the following reports:

“(1) The Pilot Program Accrediting Body shall provide to the Department and to the Sheps Center monthly survey schedules which document the surveys that were completed for the previous month and those scheduled for the current month and the following month.

“(2) The Pilot Program Accrediting Body shall provide to the Sheps Center:

“a. Documentation of surveys for the preceding month, including documentation of investigations, noncompliance, correction of noncompliance, and survey outcomes.

“b. Facility notification letters for all accreditation program actions and any follow up communication associated with those facility notification letters.

“(e) Adult Care Home Accreditation Grant Program. — As part of the pilot program, the NCSLA and the NCALA, in consultation with the Sheps Center, the Pilot Program Accrediting Body, and the Stakeholder Advisory Group, shall jointly establish and operate a grant program that provides grant awards to a maximum of 150 Pilot ACHs located in this State to cover the cost of accreditation for up to 75 Pilot ACHs and the cost of serving as a control group member and providing outcome data for up to 75 Pilot ACHs. The Sheps Center shall establish, in consultation with the Pilot Program Accrediting Body, the NCSLA, the NCALA, and the Stakeholder Advisory Group, criteria to be utilized for selecting adult care homes to participate in the adult care home accreditation grant program authorized by this section. The established criteria must ensure that a diverse group of Pilot ACHs are selected to participate as control group members or program participants in the grant program. Pilot ACHs shall not use their grant awards for any purpose other than to contract with the Pilot Program Accrediting Body or otherwise defray the expenses of serving as either a program participant or control group member of the pilot program.

“(f) Selection of Participating Pilot ACHs. — No later than 120 days after the effective date of this section, the Sheps Center, NCSLA, and NCALA shall develop a methodology for selecting program participants and control group members for the pilot program. The methodology must ensure that program participants and control group members selected for the pilot program represent diverse payor sources, star ratings, and related characteristics and must ensure that the number of program participants and the number of control group members are equivalent.

“(g) Pilot ACH Reports. — No later than 150 days after the effective date of this section, the Sheps Center, NCSLA, and NCALA shall develop a standardized methodology for the collection of information from the program participants and control group members of the pilot program for the purpose of comparing and contrasting the quality of care and the outcomes in accredited and nonaccredited facilities. As a condition of participating in the pilot program authorized by this section, the pilot ACHs must agree to follow this standardized methodology for (i) collecting information about the residents and the facility and (ii) quarterly reporting that information to the Sheps Center. The Sheps Center shall maintain the original data provided by facilities for data verification purposes. The quarterly reports shall include, but not be limited to, the following categories and types of information in the format prescribed by the Sheps Center:

“(1) Workforce, including staffing levels and staff turnover rates; consistent assignment; quality of life (stress/burnout); and satisfaction.

“(2) Resident outcomes, including physical function (falls with injury) and psychosocial well being and satisfaction.

“(3) Care coordination and transitions, including resident/family preferences and resident/family understanding, advance directives, discharge due to behaviors, emergency department visits, and hospitalization.

“(4) Medication management, including performing medication reviews and reducing medication errors.

“(5) Person centered care, including well being and belonging, individualized care and services, social connectedness, and home like atmosphere.

“(h) Evaluation of Quality Outcome Measures. — Using quality outcome measures established by the Sheps Center, the Sheps Center shall compare outcomes between the program participants and control group members for a period of two years from the onset of the pilot program. The Pilot Program Accrediting Body, program participants, and control group members shall cooperate with the Sheps Center in its efforts to gather and report data necessary to measure and compare care and resident outcomes as required by this subsection. The Sheps Center shall submit the following reports to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Department, and to the Stakeholder Advisory Group:

“(1) On or before April 30, 2023, an interim report on its findings and determinations with respect to the comparisons conducted in accordance with this subsection.

“(2) On or before July 31, 2024, a final report on its findings and determinations with respect to the comparisons conducted in accordance with this subsection.

“(i) Evaluation of Pilot Program. — The pilot program shall terminate no later than August 1, 2024. No later than 90 days after the submission of its final report under subdivision (h)(2) of this section, the Sheps Center shall conduct and submit to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Department an evaluation of the effectiveness of the pilot program for a licensure accreditation process for adult care homes that could inform future changes to the licensure process and requirements. The evaluation shall include, but not be limited to, an assessment of the following information from the pilot program:

“(1) A determination by the Sheps Center that a sufficient number of pilot ACHs and control group member AHCs participated and provided data over a sufficient period of time to enable a reliable evaluation of the pilot program.

“(2) The determination of the Sheps Center on the impact accreditation has on adult care home resident outcomes, or whether it demonstrably improves or at least maintains resident outcomes, based on the quality measures established by the Sheps Center.

“(3) The completion of unannounced surveys by the Pilot Program Accrediting Body within 12 months from the prior accreditation effective date.

“(4) The timely notification to surveyed facilities of identified deficiencies with the accreditation program’s standards.

“(5) The monitoring of the correction of identified deficiencies at the facility with the program standards of the pilot accrediting body.

“(6) Other relevant factors identified during the pilot program.

“(j) Of the funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Health and Human Services, the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2021 2022 fiscal year shall be allocated to the NCSLA and the NCALA. The NCSLA and the NCALA shall use these funds to jointly administer the grant program authorized by subsection (e) of this section. Up to ten percent (10%) of these allocated funds may be used for administrative costs incurred by NCSLA and NCALA in administering the grant program component of the pilot program.

“(k) Of the funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Health and Human Services, one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2021 2022 fiscal year shall be transferred to the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina System to be allocated to the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill for the Program on Aging, Disability, and Long Term Care within the Cecil G. Sheps Center for Health Services Research to cover the cost of participation in the pilot program authorized by subsection (b) of this section. These funds shall be expended over the period beginning with the effective date of the pilot program and ending with the submission to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Department of an evaluation of the effectiveness of this pilot program for a licensure accreditation process for adult care homes that could inform future changes to the licensure process and requirements. The Sheps Center shall use these funds to do the following:

“(1) To develop a recommended list of criteria, data collection, and methodology necessary for measuring care and resident outcomes in adult care homes. These criteria shall relate to, at a minimum, the following:

“a. Workforce, including staffing levels and staff turnover rates; consistent assignment; quality of life (stress/burnout); and satisfaction.

“b. Resident outcomes, including physical function (falls with injury) and psychosocial well being and satisfaction.

“c. Care coordination and transitions, including resident/family preferences and resident/family understanding, advance directives, discharge due to behaviors, emergency department visits, and hospitalization.

“d. Medication management, including performing medication reviews and reducing medication errors.

“e. Person centered care, including well being and belonging, individualized care and services, social connectedness, and home like atmosphere.

“(2) To solicit the program participants, obtain the relevant data, validate select data, enter and clean the data, and generate reports.

“(3) To ensure pilot ACHs compile the information related to quality outcome measures in a standardized manner, obtain that information, and compare the quality outcome measures prescribed by the Sheps Center in program participants and control group members. The methodology used in comparison of quality outcome measures shall be substantially similar to the methodology used in the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ Nursing Home Compare Quality Measures Technical Specifications, specifically utilizing comparisons based upon per 1,000 resident days.

“(4) To prepare the reports required by subsections (h) and (i) of this section.” This section became effective July 1, 2021.

§ 131D-2.2.
Persons not to be cared for in adult care homes and multiunit assisted housing with services; hospice care; obtaining services.

Adult Care Homes. — Except when a physician certifies that appropriate care can be provided on a temporary basis to meet the resident’s needs and prevent unnecessary relocation, adult care homes shall not care for individuals with any of the following conditions or care needs:

Ventilator dependency;

Individuals requiring continuous licensed nursing care;

Individuals whose physician certifies that placement is no longer appropriate;

Individuals whose health needs cannot be met in the specific adult care home as determined by the residence; and

Such other medical and functional care needs as the Medical Care Commission determines cannot be properly met in an adult care home.

Multiunit Assisted Housing With Services. — Except when a physician certifies that appropriate care can be provided on a temporary basis to meet the resident’s needs and prevent unnecessary relocation, multiunit assisted housing with services shall not care for individuals with any of the following conditions or care needs:

Ventilator dependency;

Dermal ulcers III and IV, except those stage III ulcers which are determined by an independent physician to be healing;

Intravenous therapy or injections directly into the vein, except for intermittent intravenous therapy managed by a home care or hospice agency licensed in this State;

Airborne infectious disease in a communicable state that requires isolation of the individual or requires special precautions by the caretaker to prevent transmission of the disease, including diseases such as tuberculosis and excluding infections such as the common cold;

Psychotropic medications without appropriate diagnosis and treatment plans;

Nasogastric tubes;

Gastric tubes, except when the individual is capable of independently feeding himself or herself and caring for the tube, or as managed by a home care or hospice agency licensed in this State;

Individuals requiring continuous licensed nursing care;

Individuals whose physician certifies that placement is no longer appropriate;

Unless the individual’s independent physician determines otherwise, individuals who require maximum physical assistance as documented by a uniform assessment instrument and who meet Medicaid nursing facility level-of-care criteria as defined in the State Plan for Medical Assistance. Maximum physical assistance means that an individual has a rating of total dependence in four or more of the seven activities of daily living as documented on a uniform assessment instrument;

Individuals whose health needs cannot be met in the specific multiunit assisted housing with services as determined by the residence; and

Such other medical and functional care needs as the Medical Care Commission determines cannot be properly met in multiunit assisted housing with services.

Hospice Care. — At the request of the resident, hospice care may be provided in an assisted living residence under the same requirements for hospice programs as described in Article 10 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes.

Obtaining Services. — The resident of an assisted living facility has the right to obtain services at the resident’s own expense from providers other than the housing management. This subsection shall not be construed to relieve the resident of the resident’s contractual obligation to pay the housing management for any services covered by the contract between the resident and housing management.

History.

2009-462, s. 1(e).

§ 131D-2.3.
Exemptions from licensure.

The following are excluded from this Article and are not required to be registered or obtain licensure under this Article:

Facilities licensed under Chapter 122C or Chapter 131E of the General Statutes;

Persons subject to rules of the Division of Vocational Rehabilitation Services;

Facilities that care for no more than four persons, all of whom are under the supervision of the United States Veterans Administration;

Facilities that make no charges for housing, amenities, or personal care service, either directly or indirectly; and

Institutions that are maintained or operated by a unit of government and that were established, maintained, or operated by a unit of government and exempt from licensure by the Department on September 30, 1995.

History.

2009-462, s. 1(e).

§ 131D-2.4.
Licensure of adult care homes for aged and disabled individuals; impact of prior violations on licensure; compliance history review; license renewal.

Licensure. — Except for those facilities exempt under

G.S. 131D-2.3

, the Department of Health and Human Services shall inspect and license all adult care homes. The Department shall issue a license for a facility not currently licensed as an adult care home for a period of six months. If the licensee demonstrates substantial compliance with Articles 1 and 3 of this Chapter and rules adopted thereunder, the Department shall issue a license for the balance of the calendar year. A facility not currently licensed as an adult care home that was licensed as an adult care home within the preceding 12 months is considered an existing health service facility for the purposes of G.S. 131E-184(a)(8).

Compliance History Review. — Prior to issuing a new license or renewing an existing license, the Department shall conduct a compliance history review of the facility and its principals and affiliates. The Department may refuse to license a facility when the compliance history review shows a pattern of noncompliance with State law by the facility or its principals or affiliates, or otherwise demonstrates disregard for the health, safety, and welfare of residents in current or past facilities. The Department shall require compliance history information and make its determination according to rules adopted by the Medical Care Commission.

Prior Violations. — No new license shall be issued for any adult care home to an applicant for licensure under any of the following circumstances for the period of time indicated:

Was the owner, principal, or affiliate of a licensable facility under this Chapter, Chapter 122C, or Article 7 of Chapter 110 of the General Statutes and was responsible for the operation of the facility that had its license revoked until five years after the date the revocation became effective.

(1a)

Was the owner, principal, or affiliate of a licensable facility under this Chapter, Chapter 122C, or Article 7 of Chapter 110 of the General Statutes and was responsible for the operation of the facility that had its license summarily suspended until five years after the date the suspension was lifted or terminated.

Is the owner, principal, or affiliate of an adult care home and is responsible for the operation of the facility that was assessed a penalty for a Type A or Type B violation until the earlier of one year from the date the penalty was assessed or until the home has substantially complied with the correction plan established pursuant to

G.S. 131D-34

and substantial compliance has been certified by the Department.

Is the owner, principal, or affiliate of an adult care home and is responsible for the operation of the facility that had its license downgraded to provisional status or had its admissions suspended as a result of violations under this Article, Chapter 122C, or Article 7 of Chapter 110 of the General Statutes until six months from the date of restoration from provisional to full licensure, termination of the provisional license, or lifting or termination of the suspension of admissions, as applicable.

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-184, s. 1, effective October 1, 2017.

Is or was the owner, principal, or affilate of an adult care home and is responsible for the operation of the facility where outstanding fees, fines, and penalties imposed by the State against the facility have not been paid. Fines and penalties for which an appeal is pending are exempt from consideration under this subdivision.An applicant for new licensure may appeal a denial of certification of substantial compliance under subdivision (2) of this subsection by filing with the Department a request for review by the Secretary within 10 days of the date of denial of the certification. Within 10 days of receipt of the request for review, the Secretary shall issue to the applicant a written determination that either denies certification of substantial compliance or certifies substantial compliance. The decision of the Secretary is final.

License Renewals. — License renewals shall be valid for one year from the date of renewal unless revoked earlier by the Secretary for failure to comply with any part of this section or any rules adopted hereunder. Licenses shall be renewed annually upon filing and the Department’s approval of the renewal application. The Department shall not renew a license if outstanding fees, fines, and penalties imposed by the State against the home have not been paid. Fines and penalties for which an appeal is pending are exempt from consideration. The renewal application shall contain all necessary and reasonable information that the Department may require.

In order for an adult care home to maintain its license, it shall not hinder or interfere with the proper performance of duty of a lawfully appointed community advisory committee, as defined by

G.S. 131D-31

and

G.S. 131D-32

.

The Department shall not issue a new license for a change of ownership of an adult care home if outstanding fees, fines, and penalties imposed by the State against the home have not been paid. Fines and penalties for which an appeal is pending are exempt from consideration. The consent of the current licensee is not a required prerequisite to a change of ownership of an adult care home if the current licensee has (i) been removed from the facility pursuant to Articles 3 and 7 of Chapter 42 of the General Statutes or (ii) abandoned the facility, as determined by the Department’s reasonable discretion.

Any applicant for licensure who wishes to contest the denial of a license is entitled to an administrative hearing as provided in Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. The applicant shall file a petition for a contested case within 30 days after the date the Department mails a written notice of the denial to the applicant.

History.

2009-462, s. 1(e); 2017-184, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-184, s. 1, effective October 1, 2017, added the last sentence in subsection (a); rewrote subsection (c); added the last sentence in subsection (f); and added subsection (g).

§ 131D-2.5.
License and registration fees.

The Department shall charge each adult care home with six or fewer beds a nonrefundable annual license fee in the amount of three hundred fifteen dollars ($315.00). The Department shall charge each adult care home with more than six beds a nonrefundable annual license fee in the amount of three hundred sixty dollars ($360.00) plus a nonrefundable annual per-bed fee of seventeen dollars and fifty cents ($17.50).

The Department shall charge each registered multiunit assisted housing with services program a nonrefundable annual registration fee of three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00). Any individual or corporation that establishes, conducts, manages, or operates a multiunit housing with services program, subject to registration under this section, that fails to register is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and, upon conviction shall be punishable only by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense and not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each subsequent offense. Each day of a continuing violation after conviction shall be considered a separate offense.

History.

2009-451, s. 10.76(a1); 2009-462, ss. 1(e), 3(b).

§ 131D-2.6.
Legal action by Department.

Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy, the Department may, in the manner provided by law, maintain an action in the name of the State for injunction or other process against any person to restrain or prevent the establishment, conduct, management, or operation of an adult care home without a license. Such action shall be instituted in the superior court of the county in which any unlicensed activity has occurred or is occurring.

Any individual or corporation that establishes, conducts, manages, or operates a facility subject to licensure under this section without a license is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punishable only by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense and not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each subsequent offense. Each day of a continuing violation after conviction shall be considered a separate offense.

If any person shall hinder the proper performance of duty of the Secretary or the Secretary’s representative in carrying out this section, the Secretary may institute an action in the superior court of the county in which the hindrance has occurred for injunctive relief against the continued hindrance, irrespective of all other remedies at law.

Actions under this section shall be in accordance with Article 37 of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes and Rule 65 of the Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

2009-462, s. 1(e).

§ 131D-2.7.
Provisional license; license revocation; summary suspension of license; suspension of admission.

Provisional License. — Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Department may amend a license by reducing it from a full license to a provisional license for a period of not more than 90 days whenever the Department finds that:

The licensee has substantially failed to comply with the provisions of Articles 1 and 3 of this Chapter and the rules adopted pursuant to these Articles;

There is a reasonable probability that the licensee can remedy the licensure deficiencies within a reasonable length of time; and

There is a reasonable probability that the licensee will be able thereafter to remain in compliance with the licensure rules for the foreseeable future.The Department may extend a provisional license for not more than one additional 90-day period upon finding that the licensee has made substantial progress toward remedying the licensure deficiencies that caused the license to be reduced to provisional status.The Department also may issue a provisional license to a facility, pursuant to rules adopted by the Medical Care Commission, for substantial failure to comply with the provisions of this section or rules adopted pursuant to this section. Any facility wishing to contest the issuance of a provisional license shall be entitled to an administrative hearing as provided in the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. A petition for a contested case shall be filed within 30 days after the Department mails written notice of the issuance of the provisional license.

License Revocation. — The Department may revoke a license whenever:

The Department finds that:

The licensee has substantially failed to comply with the provisions of Articles 1 and 3 of this Chapter and the rules adopted pursuant to these Articles; and

It is not reasonably probable that the licensee can remedy the licensure deficiencies within a reasonable length of time; or

The Department finds that:

The licensee has substantially failed to comply with the provisions of Articles 1 and 3 of this Chapter and the rules adopted pursuant to these Articles; and

Although the licensee may be able to remedy the deficiencies within a reasonable time, it is not reasonably probable that the licensee will be able to remain in compliance with licensure rules for the foreseeable future; or

The licensee has failed to comply with the provisions of Articles 1 and 3 of this Chapter and the rules adopted pursuant to these Articles, and the failure to comply endangered the health, safety, or welfare of the patients in the facility.

Summary Suspension. — The Department may summarily suspend a license pursuant to

G.S. 150B-3(c)

whenever it finds substantial evidence of abuse, neglect, exploitation, or any condition which presents an imminent danger to the health and safety of any resident of the home. Any facility wishing to contest summary suspension of a license shall be entitled to an administrative hearing as provided in the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. A petition for a contested case shall be filed within 20 days after the Department mails a notice of summary suspension to the licensee.

Suspension of Admissions.

In addition to the administrative penalties described in this Article, the Secretary may suspend the admission of any new residents to an adult care home where the conditions of the adult care home are detrimental to the health or safety of the residents. This suspension shall be for the period determined by the Secretary and shall remain in effect until the Secretary is satisfied that conditions or circumstances merit removing the suspension.

In imposing a suspension under this section, the Secretary shall consider the following factors:

The degree of sanctions necessary to ensure compliance with this section and rules adopted hereunder; and

The character and degree of impact of the conditions at the home on the health or safety of its residents.

The Secretary of Health and Human Services shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Any facility wishing to contest a suspension of admissions shall be entitled to an administrative hearing as provided in the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. A petition for a contested case shall be filed within 20 days after the Department mails a notice of suspension of admissions to the licensee.

History.

2009-462, s. 1(e).

§§ 131D-2.8 through 131D-2.10.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2. Other Laws Pertaining to the Inspection and Operation of Adult Care Homes.